Hawaii statutes.
§261-3
Legislation, intervention. The department of transportation may:

(1) Draft and
recommend necessary legislation to advance the interests of the State in
aeronautics;

(2) Represent the
State in aeronautical matters before federal agencies and other state agencies;

(3) Participate as
party plaintiff or defendant or as intervenor on behalf of the State or any
municipality or citizen thereof in any controversy which involves the interests
of the State in aeronautics. [L 1947, c 32, pt of §1; RL 1955, §15-8; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §261-3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next